Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.110

Quantitative and qualitative performance measures—Reporting.

The eligible counties, in collaboration with sponsoring cities, must provide a report to the department of commerce by March 1st of every other year. The report must contain the following information:

(1) The number of sponsoring cities that have adopted transfer of development rights policies and regulations incorporating transfer of development rights under this chapter, and have an interlocal agreement or have adopted the department of commerce transfer of development rights interlocal terms and conditions rule;

(2) The number of transfer of development rights transactions under this chapter using different types of transfer of development rights mechanisms;

(3) The number of acres under conservation easement under this chapter, broken out by agricultural land, forestland, and rural lands;

(4) The number of transferable development rights transferred from sending areas under this chapter;

(5) The number of transferable development rights transferred from a county into a sponsoring city under this chapter;

(6) Sponsoring city development under this chapter using transferable development rights, including:

(a) The number of total new residential units;

(b) The number of residential units created in receiving areas using transferable development rights transferred from sending areas;

(c) The amount of additional commercial floor area;

(d) The amount of additional building height;

(e) The number of required structured parking spaces reduced, if transferable development rights are specifically converted into reduced structured parking space requirements;

(f) The number of additional parking spaces allowed, if transferable development rights are specifically converted into additional receiving area parking spaces; and

(g) The amount of additional impervious surface allowed, if transferable development rights are specifically converted into receiving area impervious surfaces;

(7) The amount of the local property tax allocation revenues, if any, received in the preceding calendar year by the sponsoring city;

(8) A list of public improvements paid or financed with local infrastructure project financing;

(9) The names of any businesses locating within local infrastructure project areas as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and paid or financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure project financing;

(10) The total number of permanent jobs created in the local infrastructure project area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and paid or financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure project financing;

(11) The average wages and benefits received by all employees of businesses locating within the local infrastructure project area as a result of the public improvements undertaken by the sponsoring local government and paid or financed in whole or in part with local infrastructure project financing; and

(12) The date when any indebtedness issued for local infrastructure project financing is expected to be retired.

[ 2011 c 318 s 501.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.